Maine, session 132, LD469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3131, sub-§4-E is enacted to read:
4-E. Local consumption standard. "Local consumption standard" means a
requirement that at least 50% of the electricity delivered by a high-impact electric
transmission line into the State will be allocated to and consumed within the State.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3132, sub-§6-F is enacted to read:
6-F. High-impact electric transmission line; local consumption standard. On or
after December 31, 2026, the commission may not issue a certificate of public convenience
and necessity approving the construction of a high-impact electric transmission line to
deliver electricity generated in Canada through this State within the electric grid operated
by the New England independent system operator unless the high-impact electric
transmission line meets the local consumption standard.
The commission may issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity approving
the construction of a high-impact electric transmission line that does not meet the local
consumption standard if the commission determines that requiring the high-impact electric
transmission line to meet the local consumption standard would interfere with the reliability
of the electric grid or regional energy agreements necessary for energy security in the State.
This subsection is repealed December 31, 2031.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3132-E is enacted to read:
§3132-E. Local consumption standard required; reporting
1. Local consumption standard required. On or after December 31, 2026, a person
may not operate a high-impact electric transmission line to deliver electricity generated in
Canada through this State to other states within the electric grid operated by the New
England independent system operator unless the high-impact electric transmission line
meets the local consumption standard.
2. Reporting. A person operating a high-impact electric transmission line that receives
a certificate of public convenience and necessity in accordance with section 3132,
subsection 6-F shall file on a quarterly basis with the commission a report that must include,
but is not limited to, the total amount of electricity delivered to the State through the high-
impact electric transmission line, the total amount of electricity allocated and consumed
within the State and the total amount of electricity delivered to other states within the
electric grid operated by the New England independent system operator.
3. Penalty. If the commission finds that a person operating a high-impact electric
transmission line violates any provision of this section, the commission shall, in an
adjudicatory proceeding, impose an administrative penalty on the operator of the high-
impact electric transmission line. In determining the amount of an administrative penalty
under this section, the commission shall consider the factors listed in section 1508-A,
subsection 2. Each quarter a violation continues constitutes a separate offense. The
maximum administrative penalty for a violation may not exceed $575,000 or 5% of the
gross revenue that the operator of the high-impact electric transmission line received from
the sale of electricity outside of the State during the quarter in which the violation occurred,
whichever amount is lower. Notwithstanding section 117, subsection 3, administrative
Page 1 - 132LR0600(01)

413 penalties collected by the commission must be deposited into the Public Utilities
424 Commission Energy Affordability Fund.
4. Public Utilities Commission Energy Affordability Fund established. The Public
Utilities Commission Energy Affordability Fund, referred to in this subsection as "the
fund," is established as a nonlapsing fund administered by the commission. The fund
consists of funds that are appropriated by the Legislature, funds received from federal and
state sources, administrative penalties received by the commission for violations of this
section and section 3149 and other funds from any public or private source received for use
for any of the purposes described in this subsection. The fund must be used to provide
rebates to electricity customers in the State in accordance with rules adopted by the
commission.
5. Rulemaking. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.
6. Repeal. This section is repealed December 31, 2031.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3149 is enacted to read:
§3149. State development plan
1. Development efforts. The Governor's Energy Office, established in Title 2, section
9, shall seek to collaborate with other governmental entities, competitive electricity
providers and transmission and distribution utilities in the State to develop methods to
encourage the expansion of businesses in the State or the relocation of businesses to the
State. The office shall identify energy-intensive industries that may benefit from relocating
to the State and consider options and incentives to encourage economic development,
which may include electricity rate-related incentives.
2. Report required; transmission and distribution utility and competitive
electricity provider. No later than December 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, each
transmission and distribution utility and competitive electricity provider shall submit to the
commission a report describing the transmission and distribution utility's or competitive
electricity provider's efforts to collaborate with state and local economic development
agencies to encourage the expansion of businesses in the State or the relocation of
businesses to the State, including businesses engaged in energy-intensive industries. The
report must include specific actions taken or considered by the transmission and
distribution utility or competitive electricity provider that must include, but are not limited
to, incentives that reduce costs for electricity customers.
3. Administrative penalties. Notwithstanding section 117, subsection 3,
administrative penalties imposed by the commission in accordance with section 1508-A
for violations of this section must be deposited into the Public Utilities Commission Energy
Affordability Fund established in section 3132-E, subsection 4.
4. Repeal. This section is repealed December 31, 2031.
Sec. 5. Public Utilities Commission report. No later than December 31, 2030,
the Public Utilities Commission shall provide a report to the joint standing committee of
the Legislature having jurisdiction over electricity matters assessing the effect of the local
consumption standard requirement required in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A,
Page 2 - 132LR0600(01)

414 section 3132-E, subsection 1, including an evaluation of the benefits and costs to electricity
425 customers in the State, the effect on regional energy markets and recommendations
436 regarding the continuation of the requirement. The report must also include a
447 recommendation regarding the activities reported by transmission and distribution utilities
458 and competitive electricity providers in accordance with Title 35-A, section 3149,
469 subsection 2. After receiving the commission's report, the committee may report out a bill
570 related to any recommendations included in the report.
Sec. 6. Evaluation of local consumption standard requirement. The Public
Utilities Commission shall consider the local consumption standard requirement
established by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3132-E, subsection 1, and
develop recommendations for ways in which the cost of electricity may be reduced to
increase electricity consumption in the State and ensure that the local consumption standard
is met. By December 31, 2025, the commission shall provide a report to the Joint Standing
Committee on Energy, Utilities and Technology regarding its findings, including any
recommendations for legislation. The committee may report out a bill related to any
recommendations included in the report.
Sec. 7. Rulemaking. The Public Utilities Commission shall initiate rulemaking to
adopt rules in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3132-E no
later than 90 days after the effective date of this Act.